Utah statutes.
58-63-309.   Operating standards -- Rulemaking.

The division in collaboration with the board shall establish by rule operating standards that shall apply to the conduct of licensees under this chapter, including rules relating to use of uniforms, badges, insignia, designations, and representations used by or associated with a licensees practice under this chapter.

